src/scripts/Albanian/g2p.foma
# Copyright (C) 2021 Non-Routine LLC.  <lp@louderpages.org>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, version 3.0 of the License.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Affero General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.


# change w in foreign words - treat it as a 'u' in wht follows
#define rSepW  w -> u  || _ ;

# We will use a stress mark throughout the process until we use it to transform vowels
# to their stressed versions

source alphabet.foma
 
define Word [grapheme|Apos]+ ;

# Step One.  Convert an accented vowels to stress-marks
# gVStressed* are defined in alphabet.foma

define g2pStressVowels  
 # take out stress mark first
 0:StressMark accentedVowelMap -> || _ ;

# Now the g2p. First a rule for  the letters to phonemes
define g2pTranscribe 
	g2pVowels | g2pConsonants
		@-> || _ ;

# Now convert stress marks into stress vowel phonemes.
# We expect every stress mark to come immediately before a vowel
define pStressing 
 StressMark:0  pVowelStressMap -> || _ ;

# Get rid of any extraneous stressmarks
define clearStress StressMark:0 -> || _ ;

# define all stress rules to insert stress marks 
 source stress.foma


# remove unstressed ë at end of polysyllabic words
# We just look for a stress vowel before the last one as sign of polys
# Rather than remove, we will replace with a special, silent vowel, /ihs
# this for two reasons: 1) HTS might be able to pick-up effect of the silent e on prior syllables
# (2) it makes it easier for us to reverse parse phoneme transcriptions.

# this one adds to end of words
define silentEh ["/ih0":nonsilent -> || ["/s"|"/sh"|"/th"|"/ch"|"/tch"|"/p"|"/f"] ["/m"|"/n"] _ .#.]
 .o. ["/ih0":"/ihs0" -> ||.#. ?* pVowelStressMap.l ?* _ .#.]
 .o. nonsilent:"/ih0" -> || _; 

# this one deletes all ihs, including internal ones
define removeInternalSilentSchwa "/ihs0":0 -> || _ ;

define removeApos  
  Apos:0 -> || _ ;

 source name_dictionary.foma
 source common_dictionary.foma
 source abbrevs.foma
 source macedonian.foma
 source Schwa.foma
# The regex
define g2pRules  g2gMacStress .o. 
  AbbrevTranslation .P. Word .o. namesRule .o. DowncaseRule .o. commonWordsRule .o. removeApos  # Protect from any apos reaching here. SUPPOSITION = Vowel elided.
 .o. g2pStressVowels  # replace any accented vowels with stress marked ordinary gV 
 .o.  markStress 
 .o. internalSchwaRule
 .o. g2pTranscribe  # try for a known noun inflection or apply heuristics
 .o. pStressing # replace stress marked phoneme vowels with stressed phonemes
 .o. silentEh
# .o.  removeInternalSilentSchwa 
 .o. clearStress # clear up any unprocesses stress marks
 ;
	
regex g2pRules;
